California, session 20252026, SB1056.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1054.11 is added to the Penal Code, immediately following Section 1054.10, to read:1054.11. (a) (1) In a criminal case in which a defendant is being prosecuted for a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, violation of any offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 that is also required to register pursuant to Section 290, or a violation of subdivision (j) of Section 647, involving sexually explicit material depicting an adult victim, the court shall issue, upon a noticed motion of either the prosecutor or the defense attorney, or on its own motion, motion with notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard by both parties, a protective order governing the disclosure of that material, by any party, with conditions sufficient to prevent to do all of the following:(A) Safeguard the adult victim’s privacy.(B) Prevent unnecessary copying, transmission, or dissemination of the material.(C) Ensure the defendant’s right to a fair trial and a meaningful opportunity to participate in their own defense.(2) If a defendant is representing themselves, the court shall consider whether the protective order shall include a requirement that the material be viewed at the courthouse or in a secured location. In any such case, the defendant shall not retain a copy of the material after the case has ended.(2)(3) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an attorney shall not disclose or permit to be disclosed to a defendant, members of the defendant’s family, or anyone else this subdivision, if the court issues a protective order, the parties shall be prohibited from disclosing to any person copies of sexually explicit material depicting an adult victim, unless specifically permitted to do so by the court after a hearing and a showing of good cause. terms of the protective order.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an attorney for any party may disclose or permit to be disclosed copies of evidence of sexually explicit material depicting an adult victim to persons employed by the attorney or to persons appointed by the court to assist in the preparation of a defendant’s case only in accordance with the terms of a protective order issued by the court if that disclosure is required for that preparation. Persons provided this material by an attorney shall be informed by the attorney that further dissemination of the material, except as provided by this section or by court order, is prohibited. subject to the protective order, to a person necessary for the preparation of the case, including the defendant.(c) If a party receives any other sexually explicit material of the adult victim, the party shall notify the court for inclusion of the material in any existing protective order, or inclusion in a new or separate protective order.(c)(d) (1) This section does not relieve the prosecution from the duty to disclose the existence of any relevant or exculpatory evidence.(2) This section is not intended to affect the admissibility of any relevant evidence in any court proceeding.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Lines 1 and 2.___________________